Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXI Agriculture and Animals
Burley Tobacco

247.710.
Promotion of burley tobacco and burley tobacco products.

It is declared to be in the interest of the public welfare that Kentucky farmers who are producers of burley tobacco shall be permitted and encouraged to act jointly and in cooperation with all producers, handlers, dealers, and processors of burley tobacco in promoting and stimulating, by research, market development, and education, the increased production, use and sale, domestic and foreign, of burley tobacco and burley tobacco products.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 265, § 1.

Opinions of Attorney General.

KRS

247.710

to

247.785

is limited in scope to burley tobacco produced and sold in Kentucky by Kentucky farmers and thus is purely intrastate in scope and, therefore, tobacco produced in Kentucky but marketed out of the State and tobacco produced out of the State and marketed in Kentucky cannot be included in determining market quotas (checkoff) for assessment purposes under KRS

247.750

.

OAG 76-452

.

247.715.
Definitions for KRS 247.710 to 247.785.

As used in KRS

247.710

to

247.785

unless the context otherwise requires:

“Association” means any commission, council, board, or other body;

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Agriculture;

“Board” means the State Board of Agriculture;

“Producer” means every person who produces burley tobacco and thereafter causes the same to be marketed;

“New producer” means a producer who was not engaged in the business of producing burley tobacco at the time a referendum was conducted in accordance with the provisions of KRS

247.710

to

247.785

;

“Person” means any individual, corporation, partnership, association, cooperative, or other business entity; and

“Marketing quota” means each burley tobacco quota for which a marketing card is issued by the county agricultural stabilization conservation service office.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 265, § 2.

247.720.
Association of producers not illegal.

No association meeting or activity undertaken in pursuance of the provisions of KRS

247.710

to

247.785

and intended to benefit all of the producers, handlers, and processors of burley tobacco shall be deemed or considered illegal or in restraint of trade.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 265, § 3.

247.725.
Producers may by referendum impose assessment on products.

It is hereby further declared to be in the public interest and highly advantageous to the agricultural economy of the state that producers of burley tobacco shall be permitted by referendum, to be held among such respective groups, and subject to the provisions of KRS

247.710

to

247.785

, to levy upon themselves an assessment on burley tobacco and provide for the collection of the same for the purpose of financing or contributing towards the financing of a program of research, market development and education to increase the domestic and foreign consumption, use, sale, and markets for burley tobacco and burley tobacco products.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 265, § 4.

247.730.
Application by association for assessment — Forms.

Any existing association which is fairly representative of burley tobacco in Kentucky, such as the Council for Burley Tobacco, may at any time after the enactment of KRS

247.710

to

247.785

make application to the State Board of Agriculture on forms prescribed by such board for certification and approval for the purpose of conducting a referendum among the producers of burley tobacco upon the question of levying an assessment under the provisions of KRS

247.710

to

247.785

, and collecting and utilizing the same for the purpose stated in such referendum. Such application forms shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

Applicant’s name;

Applicant’s address;

Date;

Program to be undertaken for producers;

Brief statement of how the program is to be implemented;

Referendum to be conducted on a statewide or area basis;

Proposed effective date of the program;

Geographic area, by counties, of producers to be affected by the program; and

Signature of the applicant.

Upon receipt of the application, the Commissioner shall publish the application through the medium of the public press in the state within ten (10) days of receipt thereof.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 265, § 5.

247.735.
Certified association may hold referendum — Scope.

Upon being certified by the Commissioner of Agriculture, the association shall thereupon be fully authorized and empowered to hold and conduct on the part of the producers of burley tobacco a referendum on the question of whether or not such producers shall levy upon themselves an assessment under, and subject to, and for the purposes stated in KRS

247.710

to

247.785

. Such referendum may be conducted either on a statewide or area basis.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 265, § 6.

247.740.
Referendum on area or statewide basis — Who may participate.

Any referendum conducted under the provisions of KRS

247.710

to

247.785

may be held either on an area or statewide basis, as may be determined by the duly certified association before the referendum is called; and such referendum, on an area or statewide basis, may be participated in by all burley tobacco producers, including owners of farms on which the burley tobacco is produced and tenants sharing in the proceeds of burley tobacco. In the referendum, individuals so eligible for participation shall vote upon the question of whether or not there shall be levied an assessment in the amount set forth in the call for the referendum.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 265, § 7.

247.745.
Commissioner to supervise referendum — Expenses.

The manner, conduct, and management of any referendum held under the provisions of KRS

247.710

to

247.785

shall be under the supervision and direction of the Commissioner of Agriculture, and any and all expenses in connection therewith shall be borne by the association conducting the referendum.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 265, § 8.

247.750.
Commissioner of Agriculture to determine polling places, details of assessment limits.

With respect to any referendum conducted under the provisions of KRS

247.710

to

247.785

, the Commissioner of Agriculture shall, before calling and announcing the referendum, fix, determine, and publicly announce at least thirty (30) days before the date determined for the referendum, the date, hours, and polling places for voting in the referendum, the effective date of the assessment, if adopted, the amount and basis of the assessment proposed to be collected, the means by which the assessment shall be collected if authorized by the producers, and the general purposes to which the amount so collected shall be applied. No assessment levied in any marketing year shall be less than fifty cents ($0.50) per marketing quota.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 265, § 9; 1990, ch. 257, § 1, effective July 13, 1990.

247.755.
Rules governing holding of referendum prescribed by Commissioner — Notice — Limit on assessment.

The hours, voting places, rules and regulations, and the area within which the referendum will be conducted shall be established and determined by the Commissioner of Agriculture; and referendum date, area, hours, voting places, rules and regulations with respect to the holding of the referendum shall be published by the Commissioner in accordance with the provisions of KRS Chapter 424. Direct written notice thereof shall likewise be given to each county or area agricultural extension agent in any county covered by the referendum. The notice shall contain a statement of the amount of the assessment proposed to be levied, and state the method by which the assessment shall be collected and how the proceeds thereof shall be administered and the purposes to which they shall be applied, which purposes shall be in keeping with the provisions of KRS

247.710

to

247.785

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 265, § 10.

247.760.
Preparation of question — Poll holders — Canvass and declaration of results.

The Commissioner of Agriculture shall prepare and distribute in advance of the referendum the question to be presented to the voters and shall arrange for the necessary poll holders for conducting the referendum. Following the referendum and within ten (10) days thereafter, the Commissioner shall canvass and publicly declare the result of the referendum.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 265, § 11; 1982, ch. 360, § 73, effective July 15, 1982.

247.765.
Affirmative vote — Effect.

If, in such referendum called under the provisions of KRS

247.710

to

247.785

, a majority of the eligible producers in the area in which the referendum is conducted, who vote therein, shall vote in the affirmative and in favor of levying and collecting the assessment proposed in the referendum, then the assessment shall be collected in the manner determined and announced by the association conducting the referendum.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 265, § 12.

247.770.
Notification to warehousemen, manufacturers and dealers of assessment — Remittance of assessment.

In the event a majority of the eligible producers in the referendum who vote therein shall vote in favor of the assessment, then the Commissioner shall notify forthwith, by certified mail, every person licensed to operate a tobacco warehouse in the state, as well as every person who operates a tobacco manufacturing establishment and every tobacco dealer who buys burley tobacco directly from the producer, that on and after the date designated in the notice, which shall be not less than thirty (30) days nor more than sixty (60) days after the mailing of the notice by the Commissioner, the amount of the assessment shall be deducted by all sales markets or purchasers of burley tobacco or by their agents or representatives, from the purchase price paid the seller of burley tobacco.

On or before the fifteenth day of each month all assessments deducted shall be remitted to the association certified by the assessment referendum.

The books and records of all tobacco warehouses, tobacco manufacturers and tobacco dealer operators shall at reasonable times be open for inspection by the Commissioner or his duly authorized agents for the purpose of ascertaining the accuracy of the amounts remitted.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 265, § 13; 1980, ch. 114, § 51, effective July 15, 1980.

247.775.
Refunds.

In the event the referendum is carried in the affirmative and the assessment is levied and collected as provided, any producer upon and against whom the assessment shall have been levied and collected under the provisions of KRS

247.710

to

247.785

, if dissatisfied with the assessment and the result thereof, shall have the right to demand of and receive from the treasurer of the certified association a refund of the assessment so collected from the producer; provided, the demand for refund is made in writing within thirty (30) days from the date on which the assessment is collected from the producer.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 265, § 14.

247.780.
Annual review of program — Referendum required, when — Termination.

The board shall review the assessment program annually. If, at the end of any year after the first year of the assessment program, the board has reason to believe that a majority of producers are not in favor of the program, the Commissioner may conduct a referendum among the producers in the area or if the board determines that fifty percent (50%) of the producers in the referendum area are not participating in the program, the Commissioner shall then conduct a referendum among the producers in the area. If, upon the referendum, a majority of the producers in the area reject the program, it shall be terminated as of the end of the month in which the referendum for the area was conducted and held; otherwise, such assessment program shall continue in force and effect.

If the certified association of producers expresses in writing its desire to the Commissioner to discontinue the assessment program and terminate it, the Commissioner shall within fifteen (15) days following receipt of the request convene the board to review and act on the request. The board, after reviewing the request and conducting whatever proceedings are deemed appropriate and necessary in connection with the request, may terminate the program effective at the end of the month in which the board action is taken; and in this event the Commissioner shall notify by certified mail all operators of tobacco warehouses, tobacco manufacturers, or tobacco dealers of the termination of the program.

If the certified association requests in writing to the Commissioner to hold a referendum on the question of increasing the assessment within the limits of KRS

247.710

to

247.785

, the Commissioner shall within fifteen (15) days of the receipt of the request convene the board to review and act on the request. The board, after reviewing the request and conducting whatever proceedings are deemed appropriate and necessary with the request, shall, if the request is approved, conduct a referendum in accordance with the provisions of KRS

247.710

to

247.785

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 265, § 15; 1980, ch. 114, § 52, effective July 15, 1980.

247.785.
Injunction against violations.

Whenever in the judgment of the board or the duly certified association, an operator of a tobacco warehouse, tobacco manufacturing establishment, or tobacco dealer has engaged in or is about to engage in any acts or practices that constitute a violation of any of the provisions of KRS

247.710

to

247.785

, the board or the duly certified association may make application to the Franklin Circuit Court for an order enjoining such act or practices and obtain a restraining order and preliminary injunction against the operator.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 265, § 16.